Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NURSING STATUTES
SECTION 1.  ORS 678.010 is amended to read:
678.010. As used in ORS 678.010 to 678.410:
(1) “Advanced Practice Registered Nurse” means a:
(a) Clinical nurse specialist;
(b) Nurse practitioner; or
(c) Certified registered nurse anesthetist.
[(1)] (2) “Certified registered nurse anesthetist” means a registered nurse who has  been licensed
by the Oregon State Board of Nursing as a certified registered nurse anesthetist.
[(2)] (3) “Clinical nurse specialist”  means a licensed registered nurse who has been licensed by
the board as qualified to practice the expanded clinical specialty nursing role.
[(3)] (4) “Diagnosing” [ in the context  of the practice of nursing means identification of and dis-
crimination between physical and psychosocial signs and symptoms essential to effective execution  and
management of the nursing care. ] means the process of  identifying a patient’s disease or medical
condition through  the evaluation of the patient’s history and clinical symptoms, a physical
evaluation and any relevant diagnostic tests.
[(4) “Human responses” means signs, symptoms and processes  that denote the person’s interaction
with an actual or potential health problem. ]
(5) “Long term care facility” means a licensed skilled  nursing facility or intermediate care fa-
cility as those terms are used in ORS 442.015, an adult foster  home as defined in ORS 443.705 that
has residents over 60 years of age, or a residential care facility, including an assisted  living facility,
as defined in ORS 443.400.
(6) “Nurse intern” means a person who  holds a nurse internship license issued under ORS
678.392.
(7) “Nurse practitioner” means a registered nurse who  has been licensed by the board as qual-
ified to practice in an expanded specialty role within the practice of nursing.
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 1
(8) “Physician” means a person licensed to practice under ORS chapter 677.
(9)(a) “Practice of nursing” means autonomous and collaborative care  of persons of all ages,
families, groups and communities, sick and well, and in all settings to  promote health and safety,
including prevention and treatment of illness and management of  changes throughout a person’s life.
(b) “Practice of nursing” includes:
(A) Executing medical orders prescribed by  a physician, dentist, clinical nurse specialist, nurse
practitioner, certified registered  nurse anesthetist or other licensed health care provider licensed
or certified by this state and authorized by the board by  rule to issue orders for medical treatment,
or as otherwise described in ORS 678.010 to 678.410;
(B) Providing supervision of nursing assistants and nurse interns; and
(C) The performance of additional services that:
(i) Require education and training; and
(ii) Are recognized by the board by  rule and the nursing profession as services to be properly
performed by a nurse licensed under ORS 678.010 to 678.410.
(c) “Practice of nursing” does not include the execution of  medical orders described in this
subsection by a member of the immediate family for another member or by a  person designated by
or on behalf of a person requiring care as provided by board rule if the person executing  the order
is not licensed under ORS 678.010 to 678.410.
(10) “Practice of practical nursing” means the application of knowledge drawn from basic  edu-
cation in the social and physical  sciences in planning and giving nursing care and in assisting per-
sons toward achieving of health and well-being.
(11) “Practice  of registered nursing” means the application of knowledge drawn from broad in-
depth education in the social and physical sciences in assessing, planning, ordering, giving,  deleg-
ating, teaching and supervising care that promotes the person’s optimum health and independence.
(12) “Treating” means selection and performance of therapeutic measures  essential to the ef-
fective execution and  management of the nursing care and execution of the prescribed medical or-
ders.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 678.031, as amended by section 1, chapter 39, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
678.031. ORS 678.010 to 678.410 do not apply to:
(1) The employment of nurses in institutions or agencies of the federal government.
(2) The practice  of nursing incidental to the planned program of study for students enrolled in
nursing education programs approved by the Oregon  State Board of Nursing or accredited or ap-
proved by another state or United States territory  as described under ORS 678.040 and approved
by the board.
(3) Nursing practiced outside  this state that is incidental to a distance learning program pro-
vided by an institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4) The furnishing of nursing assistance in an emergency.
(5) The practice of any other occupation or profession licensed under the laws of this state.
(6) Care of the sick  with or without compensation when performed in connection with the
practice of the religious tenets of a well-recognized church or denomination that relies  exclusively
on treatment by prayer  and spiritual means by adherents thereof so long as the adherent does not
engage in the practice of nursing as defined in ORS 678.010 to 678.410 and 678.990 or  hold oneself
out as a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse.
(7)(a) A  nonresident [ nurses] nurse licensed and in good standing in another  state if the non-
resident [ nurses are ] nurse is  practicing in this state on a single assignment of not to exceed 90
days, renewable for not to exceed 90 days, for assignments that are for the general public benefit.
(b) A nurse previously licensed in Oregon who has  not had their license revoked, or has
not voluntarily surrendered their license, if the nurse is practicing in this state on  a single
assignment of not to exceed 90 days, renewable for not to exceed 90 days, for assignments
that are for the general public benefit.
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 2
SECTION 3.  ORS 678.034, as amended by section 2, chapter 39, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
678.034. (1) An entity that employs a nurse described under  ORS 678.031 (7) shall notify the
Oregon State Board of Nursing in writing of the number of  nurses so employed and the time of
employment and shall certify that there is  no labor dispute affecting nurses at the entity. In addi-
tion, at the request of the board, the  entity shall provide documentation that the nurses so employed
are licensed and in good standing in another state or United States territory.
(2) Nurses employed in this state under ORS 678.031 (7), at the time of employment,  shall apply
for an Oregon license [ by indorsement  or, if the nurse was previously licensed in this state, for reac-
tivation of the nurse’s Oregon license ].
SECTION 4.  ORS 678.038 is amended to read:
678.038. A  registered nurse who is employed by a public or private school, or by an education
service district or a local public health authority as defined in ORS 431.003 to provide  nursing ser-
vices at a public  or private school, may accept an order from a [ physician] health care provider,
as defined by the Oregon State Board of Nursing by rule, licensed  to practice [ medicine] in an-
other state or territory of  the United States if the order is related to the care or treatment of a
student who has been enrolled at the school for not more than 90 days.
SECTION 5.  ORS 678.039 is amended to read:
678.039. A registered nurse who is employed by or contracted with a  long term care facility or
an in-home care agency, as defined in ORS 443.305, may execute a medical order from a [ physician]
health care provider, as defined by the Oregon State Board of Nursing by  rule,  licensed to
practice [ medicine] in another state or territory of the United States if:
(1) The order is related  to the care or treatment of an individual who is a client, patient or
resident of the long term care facility or in-home care agency that employs or  contracts the regis-
tered nurse; and
(2) The individual described in subsection (1) of this section has been  a client, patient or resi-
dent of the long term care facility or in-home care agency for not more than 90 days.
SECTION 6.  ORS 678.040 is amended to read:
678.040. An applicant for a license under  ORS 678.010 to 678.448 shall provide to the Oregon
State Board of Nursing satisfactory evidence that the applicant’s physical and mental health is  such
that it is safe for the applicant to practice, and that:
(1) The applicant has graduated:
(a) From a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse nursing education program approved by
the Oregon State Board of Nursing;
(b) From a nursing program in the United States that included in its curriculum a clinical
component, as defined by the board by rule, and:
(A) Is accredited or approved by the licensing board for nurses in  a particular state or United
States territory and approved by the Oregon State Board of Nursing; or
(B) If the licensing board is not the accrediting or approval agency in that state or  United
States territory, is accredited or approved by the appropriate agency for that state or United States
territory and approved by the Oregon State Board of Nursing;
(c) In another country and has  an education equivalent to that provided by accredited or ap-
proved programs in this country; or
(d) From a military training  program that the board specifies by rule to be qualified as a nursing
education program for a licensed practical nurse; or
(2) If the applicant is an applicant for licensure by [ indorsement] endorsement, the applicant:
(a) Is currently or has been licensed as a licensed  practical nurse in another state or territory
of the United States based upon recognition of the applicant’s military education; or
(b) Has graduated from a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse nursing education program
that [ included in its curriculum a clinical component,  as defined by the board by rule ] meets the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section .
SECTION 7.
 ORS 678.050 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 3
678.050. (1) Examinations for the licensing of applicants under ORS 678.010 to 678.448 must  be
held at least once a year. An applicant must pass an examination in subjects relating to  nursing at
the practical  or registered level as the Oregon State Board of Nursing may determine necessary to
protect the public health and welfare.
(2) The board shall issue to all duly qualified applicants who pass the examination and  meet
other standards established by the board the license provided for in ORS 678.010 to  678.448 ac-
cording to the nature of the license for which  application is made and examination taken and
passed. The board shall provide evidence of current licensure.  The board shall determine by rule the
form and manner of the evidence of current licensure.
(3)(a) The board may issue a license by [ indorsement] endorsement to an  applicant qualified as
provided in ORS 678.040 who has passed  the examination used by the board and who meets other
standards established by the board. The board may also require evidence of  competency to practice
nursing at the level for which application is made.
(b) Except  as provided in ORS 676.308, the board shall process in order applications for
licensure by [ indorsement] endorsement of qualified applicants.
(c) Paragraph (b) of this subsection does not prohibit the board from processing requests  to
employ nurses  to meet temporary staffing shortages, as described in ORS 678.031 or 678.034, in fa-
cilities in this state not involved in labor disputes.
(4) Subject to terms and  conditions that the board may impose, the board may issue a limited
license to practice registered or practical nursing:
(a) To an applicant  [whose license has become void for nonpayment of fees at either level and who
otherwise meets the requirements of the board ] who the board determines needs to demonstrate
the ability to provide safe nursing care . The board may[ , in issuing a  limited license, ] require the
applicant to [ demonstrate ability to give safe nursing care by undergoing ] undergo a supervised ex-
perience in nursing practice designated by the board, or [ by satisfactorily completing ] to satisfac-
torily complete a continuing education program approved by the board , in order to  demonstrate
the applicant’s ability to  provide safe nursing care . The license issued under this paragraph ex-
pires on the date set in the license by the board. Upon the  applicant’s satisfactory completion of the
board’s requirements, and payment of the renewal fee and delinquency fee,  the board shall issue to
the applicant a license to practice nursing.
[(b) To an applicant who has not practiced nursing in any  state for a period of five years, but has
maintained a current license  by the payment of fees. The applicant may not practice nursing in Oregon
unless the applicant applies to the board for  a limited license and the board issues the limited license
to the applicant. The board may, in issuing a limited license, require the applicant  to demonstrate
ability to give safe nursing care by undergoing a supervised experience in nursing practice  designated
by the board, or by satisfactorily completing  a continuing education program approved or designated
by the board. The board may not issue a  license if, in the judgment of the board, the applicant’s con-
duct has been  such, during absence from practice, that the applicant would be denied a license if ap-
plying for an initial license to practice nursing in this state. ]
[(c)] (b) To a licensee who has been placed on probation or has been otherwise subjected  to
disciplinary action by the board.
[(d)] (c) To  any of the following persons if the person is affiliated with a planned program of
study in Oregon consistent with the standards and requirements established by the board:
(A) A foreign nurse;
(B) A foreign student nurse; or
(C) A nurse licensed in another jurisdiction.
(e) During an emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to ORS 401.165,  to a nurse licensed
in another jurisdiction. The board shall adopt rules  to establish criteria for issuance of a license
under this paragraph.
(5) The board may adopt by rule  requirements and procedures for placing a license or certificate
in inactive status.
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 4
(6)(a) The board may grant  retired status [ may be granted ] to a person licensed as a  registered
nurse, licensed practical nurse, nurse practitioner, certified registered nurse anesthetist  or clinical
nurse specialist and who surrenders the person’s license while in good standing with the  issuing
authority if the person is not subject to any pending disciplinary investigation or action. The board
may adopt by rule requirements, procedures and fees for placing a license in retired status.
(b) A person granted retired status by the board under  the provisions of paragraph (a) of this
subsection:
(A) Shall pay a fee in an amount to be determined by the board for retired status.
(B) May not practice nursing or offer to practice nursing in this state.
(C) May use the title or abbreviation with the retired license only if the  designation “retired”
appears after the title or abbreviation.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 678.055 is amended to read:
678.055. (1)  The Oregon State Board of Nursing may issue a nurse emeritus license to an appli-
cant who:
(a) Is a certified registered nurse anesthetist, clinical nurse  specialist, licensed practical nurse,
nurse practitioner or registered nurse;
(b) Has been granted retired status by the board as described in ORS 678.050; and
(c) Pays the license fee as established by rule of the board.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS  678.050 (6), a nurse emeritus may engage in the practice of nursing,
practical nursing or registered nursing on a volunteer or other noncompensatory basis.
(3) The board shall adopt rules to establish:
(a) The [ annual] license fee for the nurse emeritus license described in subsection (1) of  this
section; and
(b) The method to determine the competency required to practice  nursing, practical nursing or
registered nursing as a nurse emeritus.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 678.101 is amended to read:
678.101. (1) A person licensed to practice nursing , including as an Advanced Practice Regis-
tered Nurse,  shall apply to the Oregon State Board of Nursing for renewal of the license[ , other
than a limited  license, in ] every second year [ before 11:59 p.m. on the anniversary of the birthdate
of the person in the odd-numbered year for persons whose birth occurred in an odd-numbered  year and
in the even-numbered year for persons whose birth occurred in an  even-numbered year. Persons whose
birthdate anniversary falls on February 29 shall be treated as if the anniversary were March 1 ].
(2) Each  application must be accompanied by a [ nonrefundable] renewal fee payable to the board.
The renewal fee is refundable at the discretion of the board.
(3) The board may not renew the license of a person licensed to practice nursing unless:
(a) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section are met; and
(b) Prior to payment of the renewal fee  described in subsection (2) of this section the person
completes, or provides documentation of completion within the previous 36 months, of:
(A) A one-hour pain management education program approved  by the board and developed based
on recommendations of the Pain Management Commission; or
(B) An equivalent pain management education program, as determined by the board.
(4) The license of any person not renewed for  failure to comply with subsections (1) to (3) of this
section is expired and the person shall be considered delinquent and is subject  to any delinquent fee
established under ORS 678.410.
[(5) A registered nurse who has been issued a license as  a nurse practitioner, clinical nurse spe-
cialist or certified registered nurse anesthetist shall apply as specified by the board by  rule for renewal
of the license  and for renewal of the authority to prescribe in every second year before 11:59 p.m. on
the anniversary of the birthdate, as determined for the person’s license to practice nursing. ]
(5) This section does not apply  to a person who holds a limited license to practice nurs-
ing.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 678.111 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 5
678.111. In the manner prescribed in ORS chapter 183 for a contested case, and except  as pro-
vided in ORS 678.138[ :],
[(1)] the Oregon State Board of Nursing may [ refuse to issue a license to practice nursing by ex-
amination or indorsement or a nurse internship license or may  revoke or suspend a license, issue a
limited license,  censure or reprimand or place on probation, subject to any conditions imposed by the
board, a person issued a license, for any of the following  causes ] revoke, suspend, deny or impose
conditions on a  license issued by the board, or on an inactive or retired status granted by
the board, and reprimand or place on probation, subject  to terms imposed by the board, a
person licensed by the board for any of  the reasons described in this section, including the
following:
[(a)] (1) Conviction of the [ licensee] person of crime where the crime  bears demonstrable re-
lationship to the practice of nursing. A copy  of the record of the conviction, certified to by the clerk
of the court entering the conviction, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.
[(b)] (2) Gross incompetence or  gross negligence of the [ licensee] person in the practice of
nursing at the level for which the [ licensee] person is licensed.
[(c)] (3) Any willful fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or procuring a license or renewal
of a license.
[(d)] (4) Fraud or deceit [ of the licensee ] by the person in the practice of nursing or in admission
to the practice of nursing.
[(e)] (5) Impairment as defined in ORS 676.303.
[(f)] (6) Conduct derogatory to the standards of nursing.
[(g)] (7) Violation of  any provision of ORS 678.010 to 678.448 or rules adopted under ORS 678.010
to 678.448.
[(h)] (8) Revocation or suspension of a license to practice  nursing by any state or territory of
the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction authorized to issue nursing credentials whether or not
that license or credential was relied upon in issuing that  license in this state. A certified copy of
the order of revocation or suspension shall be conclusive evidence of the revocation or suspension.
[(i)] (9) Physical condition  that makes the [ licensee] person unable to conduct safely the practice
for which the [ licensee] person is licensed.
[(j)] (10) Violation of any condition imposed by the board when issuing a limited license.
[(2) A license may be denied, suspended or revoked for the reasons stated in subsection (1) of  this
section.]
[(3) A license in inactive status  may be denied, suspended or revoked for the reasons stated in
subsection (1) of this section. ]
[(4) A license in retired status may be denied, suspended or revoked for any cause stated  in sub-
section (1) of this section. ]
SECTION 11.
 ORS 678.113 is amended to read:
678.113. (1) During the course of an investigation into the performance or conduct of an appli-
cant, certificate holder or  licensee, the Oregon State Board of Nursing may order mental health,
physical condition or [ chemical dependency ] substance use disorder  evaluations of the applicant,
certificate holder or licensee upon reasonable belief that the  applicant, certificate holder or licensee
is unable to practice nursing with reasonable skill and safety to patients.
(2) When the board has  reasonable cause to believe that an applicant, certificate holder or
licensee is or may be unable  to practice nursing with reasonable skill and safety to patients, the
board may order a competency  examination of the applicant, certificate holder or licensee for the
purpose of determining the fitness of the applicant, certificate holder or licensee to practice  nursing
with reasonable skill and safety to patients.
(3) A licensee or certificate  holder by practicing nursing, or an applicant by applying to practice
nursing in Oregon, gives consent to submit to mental health, physical condition  or [ chemical de-
pendency] substance use disorder  evaluations when ordered by the board  and waives any objection
on the  grounds of privileged communication to the admissibility of information derived from evalu-
ations ordered by the board.
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 6
(4) By rule, the board may require :
(a) Evidence of continuing education [ in a nursing education program  approved by the board ] as
a prerequisite for renewal of registered or practical nursing licenses, or both[ , or may require ];
(b) [Continuing education for persons whose license has lapsed for  nonpayment of fees, who have
not practiced nursing for five  years, or who have their licenses suspended or revoked as a condition
to relicensure. ] As a condition of relicensure, evidence of continuing education for a person
whose license has been suspended or revoked; or
(c) Evidence of continuing education for a person whose license has lapsed for nonpay-
ment of fees or who has not practiced nursing for the last five years.
SECTION 12.  ORS 678.150 is amended to read:
678.150. (1) The Oregon State Board of Nursing  shall elect annually from its number a president,
a president-elect  and a secretary, each of whom shall serve until a successor is elected and qualified.
The board shall meet on the call of the  president or as the board may require. Special meetings of
the board  may be called by the secretary upon the request of any three members. Five members
constitute a quorum.
(2) The board shall adopt a seal which shall be in the care of the executive director.
(3) The board shall keep a  record of all its proceedings and of all persons licensed and schools
or programs approved under ORS 678.010 to 678.448. The records must at all reasonable times be
open to public scrutiny.
(4) The executive director of the board  may hire and define the duties of employees as necessary
to carry out the provisions of ORS 678.010  to 678.448. The executive director, with approval of the
board, may employ special consultants.  All salaries, compensation and expenses incurred or allowed
shall be paid out of funds received by the board.
(5) The board shall determine the qualifications of applicants  for a license to practice nursing
in this state and establish educational and  professional standards for such applicants subject to laws
of this state.
(6) The board shall:
(a) Exercise general supervision over the practice of nursing in this state.
(b) Prescribe standards and approve curricula for nursing education  programs preparing persons
for licensing under ORS 678.010 to 678.448.
(c) Provide for surveys of nursing education programs as may be necessary.
(d) Approve  nursing education programs that meet the requirements of ORS 678.010 to 678.448
and of the board.
(e) Deny or withdraw  approval from nursing education programs for failure to meet prescribed
standards.
(f) Examine, license and renew the licenses of duly qualified applicants.
(g) Issue subpoenas for any records relevant  to a board investigation, including patient and
other medical records, personnel records applicable  to nurses and nursing assistants, records of
schools  of  nursing and nursing assistant training records and any other relevant records; issue
subpoenas to persons for personal  interviews relating to board investigations; compel the attendance
of witnesses; and administer oaths or affirmations  to persons giving testimony during an investi-
gation or at hearings. In any proceeding under this subsection, when a subpoena is issued to  an
applicant, certificate holder or licensee of the board, a claim of  nurse-patient privilege under ORS
40.240 or of psychotherapist-patient privilege under ORS 40.230 is not  grounds for quashing the
subpoena or for refusing to produce the material that is subject to the subpoena.
(h) Enforce the provisions of ORS 678.010 to 678.448, and incur necessary expenses for  the
enforcement.
(i) Adopt rules to prescribe:
[(A) Standards for the delegation of patient care tasks by a registered nurse  to a nursing assistant.
The standards must  specify that only a registered nurse may delegate the provision of nursing care.
The standards must include rules governing the delegation of administration of medication, including
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 7
of controlled substances, and other tasks ordered  or prescribed by a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse
specialist or a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677. ]
(A) Standards for the assignment of authorized duties by a nurse to  a nursing assistant.
The standards must include rules governing the  administration of noninjectable medication,
including controlled substances, and other tasks ordered or prescribed by a health care pro-
vider, as defined by the board by rule.
(B) Standards for the delegation  by a registered nurse of procedures ordered or prescribed by
a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist or a physician  licensed under ORS chapter 677 to
persons other than licensed  nursing personnel in a community-based setting, as defined by the board.
The rules must :
(i) Provide for the delegation of procedures related to administration  of medication , including
the administration of controlled substances [.]; and
(ii) Specify that the delegation must occur under the procedural guidance,  initial direc-
tion and periodic inspection and evaluation of the delegating registered nurse.
(j) Notify  licensees at least annually of changes in legislative or board rules that affect the
licensees. Notice may be by newsletter or other appropriate means.
(7) The board shall determine the scope of practice as delineated by the knowledge acquired
through approved courses of education or through experience.
[(8)(a) The board shall adopt rules regarding the provision of nursing care and various tasks  re-
lating to the administration of medication,  including the administration of controlled substances, for the
community-based settings described in subsection (6) of this section. ]
[(b) The rules adopted under this subsection must: ]
[(A) Provide for the delegation, to other than licensed nursing  personnel, of tasks relating to the
administration of medication and patient care tasks that  are ordered or prescribed by a physician li-
censed under ORS chapter 677, a clinical nurse specialist or a nurse practitioner. ]
[(B) Specify that the delegation must occur under the procedural guidance, initial direction and
periodic inspection and evaluation of the physician, clinical nurse specialist, nurse  practitioner or reg-
istered nurse. ]
[(C) Specify that the provision of nursing care may be delegated only by a registered nurse. ]
[(D) Determine sites  in addition to the facilities described in this subsection where the delegation
of nursing tasks and administration of medication may occur. ]
[(9)] (8) The board may  require applicants, licensees and certificate holders under ORS 678.010
to 678.448 to provide to the board data concerning the  individual’s nursing employment and educa-
tion.
[(10)] (9) For the purpose of requesting a state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, the board may require the fingerprints of a person who is:
(a) Applying for a license or certificate that is issued by the board;
(b) Applying for renewal of a license or certificate that is issued by the board; or
(c) Under investigation by the board.
[(11)] (10) Pursuant to ORS chapter 183, the board shall adopt rules necessary to carry  out the
provisions of ORS 678.010 to 678.448.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 678.170 is amended to read:
678.170. (1)  All [ money] moneys  received by the Oregon State Board of Nursing under ORS
678.010 to 678.448 shall be paid  into the General Fund in the State Treasury and placed to the credit
of the Oregon State Board of Nursing Account.  Such moneys are appropriated continuously to the
board and shall be used only for the administration and enforcement of ORS 676.850,  676.860 and
678.010 to 678.448.
(2) The board shall  keep a record of all moneys deposited in the Oregon State Board of Nursing
Account. This record shall indicate by separate cumulative accounts the  source from which the
moneys are derived and the individual activity or program  against which each withdrawal is
charged.
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 8
(3) The board  may maintain a petty cash fund in compliance with ORS 293.180 in the amount
of $1,000.
SECTION 14.  ORS 678.340 is amended to read:
678.340. (1) Any institution desiring to  establish a nursing education program leading to licens-
ing [ or a continuing education program that may be recognized or required by the Oregon State  Board
of Nursing to supplement such program ] shall apply to the [ board] Oregon State Board of Nursing
and submit satisfactory evidence that [ it] the institution  is prepared to meet the curricula and
standards prescribed by the board.
(2) In considering applications under subsection (1) of this section the board shall review:
(a) Statewide needs for nursing education programs or supplementary programs; and
(b) The financial and clinical resources of the institution making application and the ability  of
the institution to retain qualified faculty.
(3) An institution or program may  not represent itself as qualified or approved to prepare nurses
for licensing unless the institution is approved by the board.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 678.370 is amended to read:
678.370. (1) The Oregon State Board of Nursing shall issue a license to act as a clinical nurse
specialist to any licensed registered nurse who meets the requirements established by the board
pursuant to ORS 678.372.
(2) A person may not act as a clinical nurse specialist, use the name, title,  designation, initial
or abbreviation of clinical nurse  specialist or otherwise hold oneself out as a clinical nurse spe-
cialist unless the person is  licensed as a clinical nurse specialist pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) A licensed clinical  nurse specialist is authorized to prescribe drugs for the use of and ad-
ministration to other persons if approval has been given under ORS 678.390. The  authority to pre-
scribe and dispense prescription drugs shall be included within  the scope of practice of licensed
clinical nurse specialists as defined by rules of the board.
SECTION 16.  ORS 678.392 is amended to read:
678.392. (1) The Oregon State Board of Nursing shall issue a  nurse internship license to an ap-
plicant who:
(a) Is a student who is enrolled in and has  successfully completed at least one academic term
of a nursing education program that:
(A) Is approved by the board or accredited or approved by another state or United States  ter-
ritory as described under ORS 678.040 and approved by the board; and
(B) Includes a clinical component; and
[(b) Submits documentation from the applicant’s nursing education  program that, to the satisfaction
of the board, specifies the nursing tasks and functions that the applicant is qualified to perform; ]
[(c) Meets any other requirements established by the board by rule; and ]
[(d) Pays a licensure fee. ]
(b) Meets any other requirements established by the board by rule.
(2) The board may require a licensure fee for a nurse internship license.
[(2)] (3) The board may adopt by rule the duration for which a nurse internship license is  valid
and any requirements and fees for license renewal.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 678.396 is amended to read:
678.396. (1) A nurse intern may:
(a) Perform  specific nursing functions within the limits of the nurse intern’s nursing education
program;
(b) Practice nursing only  under the direct supervision of a registered nurse who has agreed to
act as the nurse intern’s supervisor under ORS 678.398;
(c) Gather information about and administer care to patients; and
(d) Participate in all aspects of  the nursing care process under the supervision required and
limitations imposed by this section.
(2) A nurse intern may not:
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 9
(a) Assume ongoing responsibility for assessments, planning, implementation or  evaluation of
guidance of the nurse intern’s supervisor;
(b) Function independently, act in a  supervisory role or delegate tasks to licensed practical
nurses, nursing assistants or unlicensed persons;
(c) Administer chemotherapy, blood or blood products, intravenous medications or  controlled
substances;
(d) Carry out procedures on central lines; or
(e) Perform any other task or function that [ is not included  in the documentation described in
ORS 678.392 (1)(b) ] the nurse intern is not qualified to perform .
SECTION 18.
 ORS 678.398 is amended to read:
678.398. (1) A registered nurse who is responsible for the supervision of a nurse intern:
(a) Is accountable at all times for the safety and well-being of  patients to whom the nurse intern
provides care;
(b) Shall maintain an awareness of the nursing tasks and functions performed by  the nurse in-
tern;
(c) Shall be immediately available to the nurse  intern through methods determined by the
Oregon State Board of Nursing; and
(d) Shall have knowledge of the tasks and functions that the nurse  intern may perform [ as de-
tailed on the documentation described in ORS 678.392 (1)(b) ].
(2) The board may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 678.410 is amended to read:
678.410. (1) The Oregon State  Board of Nursing may establish and collect fees necessary to
carry out the provisions of ORS 678.010 to 678.448.
(2) Fees are [ nonrefundable] refundable at the discretion of the board .
(3)(a) The board shall obtain approval from the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services
prior to establishing fees under this section.
(b) A fee established and  collected under this section may not exceed the cost of administering
a regulatory program for which the fee is established and collected,  as authorized by the Legislative
Assembly within the Oregon State Board of Nursing budget, subject to modification by  the Emer-
gency Board.
(c) If federal or other funds are available to offset costs of administering the program, fees shall
be established based on net costs to the  state but may not exceed $75 per biennium for a nursing
assistant certification.
SECTION 20. ORS 678.415 is added to and made a part of ORS 678.010 to 678.410.
SECTION 21.  ORS 678.415 is amended to read:
678.415. (1) The Oregon State Board of  Nursing shall impose an additional $9 fee for each ex-
amination fee,  each license by [ indorsement] endorsement fee and each license renewal fee charged
under ORS 678.410 for a registered nurse or a licensed practical  nurse for the purposes specified in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The additional fees imposed on examination fees,  license by [ indorsement] endorsement fees
and license renewals  by subsection (1) of this section shall be credited to the Oregon Nursing Ad-
vancement Fund established by ORS 678.417.
SECTION 22.  ORS 678.440 is amended to read:
678.440. (1) As used  in [ this section and ORS 678.442, 678.444, 678.445, 678.447 and ] ORS 678.440
to 678.448[,]:
(a) “Medication aide” means a nursing assistant  who has additional training and quali-
fications, as determined by the Oregon State Board of Nursing.
(b) “Nursing assistant” means an individual who assists licensed nursing personnel in the pro-
vision of nursing care.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly to require that  nursing assistants be adequately
trained.
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 10
(3) The [ Oregon State Board of Nursing ] board shall  prepare curricula and standards for train-
ing programs for nursing assistants. The  curricula and standards must provide for additional train-
ing for nursing assistants to have the authority to administer noninjectable medications.
(4) The Department of Human Services may  impose civil penalties or revoke the license of any
long term care facility that employs an untrained nursing assistant for a period  of more than eight
weeks without providing for the training prescribed by the board. Any license that is  revoked shall
be revoked as provided in ORS 441.030.
(5) The Oregon Health Authority may impose civil penalties or revoke the  license of a health
care facility that employs any  untrained nursing assistant for a period of more than eight weeks
without providing for  the training prescribed by the board. Any license that is revoked shall be re-
voked as provided in ORS 441.030.
SECTION 23.  ORS 678.442 is amended to read:
678.442. (1) The Oregon State Board of Nursing shall  establish standards for certifying and may
certify as a nursing assistant any person who:
(a) Submits an application;
(b)(A) Shows completion of an approved training program for nursing assistants; [ or]
(B) Has military training or experience that the board determines is substantially equivalent  to
the training required by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; or
(C) Has other health care education, training or experience that the board  determines is
sufficient; and
(c) Passes a board approved examination.
(2) In the manner prescribed  in ORS chapter 183, the board may [ revoke, suspend or deny a
certificate issued under this section, reprimand a nursing assistant or  place a nursing assistant on
probation for a period of  time and subject to any conditions specified by the board for the following
reasons] revoke, suspend, deny or impose conditions  on a certificate issued by the board and
reprimand or place on probation, subject to terms imposed by  the board, a person certified
by the board for any of the reasons described in this section, including the following :
(a) Conviction of the certificate holder of a crime if the crime bears demonstrable  relationship
to the duties of a nursing assistant.  A copy of the record of the conviction, certified to by the clerk
of the court entering the conviction, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.
(b) Any willful fraud or misrepresentation in applying for  or procuring a certificate or renewal
of a certificate.
(c) Impairment as defined in ORS 676.303.
(d) Violation of any provisions of ORS 678.010 to 678.448 or rules adopted under ORS 678.010
to 678.448.
(e) Physical condition  that makes the certificate holder unable to perform safely the duties of
a nursing assistant.
(f) Conduct unbecoming a nursing assistant in the performance of duties.
(3) The board shall  establish by rule a procedure for the biennial renewal of nursing assistant
certificates. The certificate renewal procedure  must be substantially like the procedure established
for the licensing of nurses under ORS 678.101.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 192.345, the board may use the results of a nursing assistant  exam-
ination for the continuing education of applicants for certification as a nursing assistant.
(5) During an emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to  ORS 401.165 and subject to
terms and  conditions that the board may impose, the board may issue a limited certificate to a
nursing assistant authorized in another jurisdiction. The board shall  adopt rules to establish criteria
for issuance of a limited certificate under this subsection.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 678.444 is amended to read:
678.444. (1) The Oregon State Board of Nursing shall establish standards  for training programs
for nursing assistants. [Upon application therefor, ] An institution may  apply to the board for
approval of a nursing assistant training program. Upon receipt of an  application, the board
shall review and may approve programs that meet board standards.
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 11
(2) The board may, at intervals determined by the board, survey training programs  ap-
proved under this section to ensure the training programs continue to meet the standards
established under this section.  The board may revoke approval from a training program that
the board determines does not meet the standards.
(3) The board by  means of a contested case proceeding under ORS chapter 183 may revoke ap-
proval of any training program that ceases to meet board standards.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 678.445 is amended to read:
678.445. (1) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that the Oregon State  Board of Nursing
adopt by rule[ , subject to  ORS 678.155, ] standards that allow a nursing assistant in a long term care
facility to administer noninjectable medication under the  direct supervision of or as [ delegated] as-
signed by a [ registered ] nurse.
[(2) If a nurse employed by the long term care facility  questions the efficacy, need or safety of
continuation of medications dispensed by that nurse or by another  employee of the facility to a patient,
the nurse shall report that question to the physician or nurse practitioner who ordered  or authorized
the medication and shall seek further instructions concerning the continuation of the medication. ]
(2) If a nurse employed in a long term  care facility questions the efficacy, need or safety
of continuation of medications dispensed by the nurse or by another employee  of the long
term care facility to a patient, the nurse shall report that question to  the health care pro-
vider, as defined by the board by rule, who ordered or authorized the medication  and shall
seek further instructions concerning the continuation of the medication.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 26.  ORS 169.750, as amended by section  45, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
169.750. A juvenile detention facility may not:
(1) Impose upon a detained juvenile for purposes  of discipline or punishment any infliction of
or threat of physical injury or pain, deliberate humiliation, physical  restraint, withholding of meals,
or isolation, or detention under conditions that violate the provisions of subsections (2) to  (8) of this
section or ORS 169.076 (7) to (11) or (13) to (15) or 169.740;
(2) Use any physical force, other means of physical control or isolation upon a  detained juvenile
except as reasonably  necessary and justified to prevent escape from the facility, physical injury to
another person, to  protect a detained juvenile from physical self-injury or to prevent destruction of
property, or to effectuate the confinement of  the juvenile in roomlock or isolation as provided for
in ORS 169.090, 169.730 to  169.800, 419A.050 and 419A.052, and for only so long as it appears that
the danger exists. A use of force or other physical means of control may not employ:
(a) The  use of restraining devices for a purpose other than to prevent physical injury or escape,
or, in any case, for a period  in excess of six hours. However, the time during which a detained ju-
venile is being  transported to another facility pursuant to court order shall not be counted within
the six hours; or
(b) Isolation for a period in excess of six hours;
(3) Use roomlock except for  the discipline and punishment of a detained juvenile for violation
of a rule of conduct or behavior of  the facility as provided for in ORS 169.076 (12) or for conduct
that constitutes a crime under the laws of this state or that  would justify physical force, control or
isolation under subsection (2) of this section;
(4) Cause to be made an internal examination of  a detained juvenile’s anus or vagina, except
upon probable cause that contraband,  as defined in ORS 162.135 (1), will be found upon such exam-
ination and then only by a physician licensed under  ORS chapter 677, naturopathic physician li-
censed under ORS chapter 685, physician  associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or nurse
licensed under ORS chapter 678;
(5)(a) Administer to  any detained juvenile medication, except upon the informed consent of the
juvenile or in the case of an imminent  threat to the life of the juvenile or where the juvenile has
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 12
a contagious or communicable disease that poses an imminent threat to the  health of other persons
in the facility. However, prescription medication may not be  administered except upon a written
prescription or written order by a physician  licensed under ORS chapter 677, physician associate
licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390,
naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685 or dentist  licensed under ORS chapter 679,
and administered by a person authorized under ORS chapter 677, 678 or  679 to administer
medication. Facility staff  not otherwise authorized by law to administer medications may administer
noninjectable medications in  accordance with rules adopted by the Oregon State Board of Nursing
pursuant to ORS 678.150 [ (8)];
(b) Nonmedical personnel shall receive training for administering medications, including recog-
nition of and response to  drug reactions and unanticipated side effects, from the responsible physi-
cian, physician associate, naturopathic physician or nurse and the official responsible  for the
facility. All personnel shall be responsible for administering the dosage medications  according to
orders and for recording  the administrations of the dosage in a manner and on a form approved by
the responsible physician, physician associate, naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner; and
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, medication may not be administered unless a
physician, physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505  to 677.525, naturopathic physician li-
censed under ORS chapter 685 or nurse licensed under ORS chapter 678 is either physically on  the
premises or readily available by telephone and within 30 minutes travel time of the patient;
(6) Administer to any detained juvenile any medication or medical  procedure for purposes of
experimentation;
(7) Discipline or punish any juvenile for conduct or behavior by roomlock,  for a period in excess
of 12 hours, or by  denial of any privilege, regularly awarded other detained adults or juveniles, for
more than one day, except after:
(a) Advising the juvenile in writing of the alleged offensive conduct or behavior;
(b) Providing the juvenile the opportunity to a  hearing before a staff member who was not a
witness to the alleged offensive conduct or behavior;
(c) Providing the juvenile the opportunity to produce witnesses and  evidence and to cross-
examine witnesses;
(d) Providing the detained juvenile the opportunity to testify, at the sole option of the  juvenile;
and
(e) A finding that the alleged conduct or behavior was proven by a preponderance of  the evi-
dence and that it violated a rule of conduct or behavior of the facility as  provided for in ORS
169.076 (12) or constituted a crime under the laws of this state; and
(8) Detain juveniles  with emotional disturbances, mental retardation or physical disabilities on
the same charges and circumstances for which other  juveniles would have been released or provided
with another alternative.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 441.685 is amended to read:
441.685. (1) Upon receipt of a report under ORS 441.645 to 441.680 or upon receipt of a complaint
by a resident or legal  guardian of a resident, or other public or private official, as defined in ORS
441.630 by the  Department of Human Services, the Director of Human Services may designate
monitors who shall observe the activities  of the facility and report to the director. The monitors
may be designated without prior notice to the operator or owner of the facility. The monitors shall
observe the operations of the facility for a  period of not to exceed 10 days, assist the facility by
advising it on how to comply with  state requirements and shall submit a written report periodically
to the director on the operation and condition of the facility.
(2) The  monitors shall have access to the facilities to the extent necessary to carry out their
duties. The monitors shall  also have access to all records pertaining to the operation of the facility.
(3) Upon completion of their investigations, the monitors shall file a final  report with the di-
rector and may:
(a) Find that problems in the facility have been resolved and recommend that further action by
the department is unnecessary;
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 13
(b) Find that the problems in  the facility are continuing but the facility owner, operator or other
controlling person can  resolve them within a period of not more than three months, and that during
the three-month period the health and welfare  of the residents of the facility are not jeopardized
thereby; or
(c) Find that the problems of the facility have not been  resolved and the department should take
steps to obtain  compliance with resident care standards and continue monitoring for an additional
period.
(4) Associations representing long term care  facilities may initiate a peer review process for any
facility that is a member of the association and that is the subject of any complaint filed against it
under ORS 441.630 to 441.685[ , 678.155 and 678.445] or any other provision of law. The report of the
peer review process shall be submitted to the department. The peer  review described in this sub-
section is in addition to and not in lieu of  any other investigation, observation or report of the
monitors otherwise required  or authorized by ORS 441.630 to 441.685[ , 678.155 ] and [ 678.445]
678.150. The association and persons conducting the peer review process  acting in good faith shall
not be subject to an action for civil damages as a result thereof.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
(b) “Director” means the Director of Human Services.
(c) “Facility” means a long term care facility as defined in ORS 442.015.
(d) “Monitor” means an agent of the director designated by the director to  observe the opera-
tion of a facility.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 443.445 is amended to read:
443.445. (1) A residential facility may not admit individuals who  require continuous nursing care
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3)  of this section, if any resident of a residential facility
requires nursing care for eight or more consecutive days or a physician or the designee of a  physi-
cian, a naturopathic physician or a  registered nurse certifies that continued nursing care is re-
quired, the  resident shall be transferred to an appropriate health care facility for as long as
necessary.
(3) A resident of  a residential care facility, residential training facility or residential training
home who requires  nursing care in addition to training or care needs, or any combination thereof,
may be served by that facility or home  with approval from the Department of Human Services and
in accordance with the rules of the  department and consistent with rules adopted by the Oregon
State Board of Nursing under ORS 678.150 [ (8)].
(4) A resident of a residential treatment facility or residential treatment home  who requires
nursing care in addition to treatment needs may be served  by that facility or home with approval
from the Oregon Health Authority and in accordance with  the rules of the authority and consistent
with rules adopted by the Oregon State Board of Nursing under ORS 678.150 [ (8)].
(5) A residential facility may not admit  individuals of categories other than those designated on
its license without prior written consent of the licensing agency.
(6) In the case of residential facilities  supervised by and operated exclusively for persons who
rely upon prayer or spiritual means for healing in accordance with the creed or tenets of a well-
recognized church or religious denomination, no medical, psychological or  rehabilitative procedures
shall be required.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 443.775 is amended to read:
443.775. (1) The licensing agency shall adopt rules governing adult foster homes  and the level
of care provided in such homes, including the provision of care to more than  one person with
nursing care needs under specified conditions and agency approval,  such as are necessary to protect
the health, safety or welfare of the residents and to provide for an appropriate continuum of  care,
but shall not be inconsistent  with the residential nature of the living accommodations and the family
atmosphere of the home. The rules shall be  consistent with rules adopted by the Oregon State Board
of Nursing under ORS 678.150 [ (8)].
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 14
(a) An exception to the limit of one resident with nursing care  needs may be granted if the
provider proves to the licensing agency by  clear and convincing evidence that such an exception
will not jeopardize the care, health, safety or welfare of the residents and that  the provider is ca-
pable of meeting the additional care needs of the new resident.
(b) The licensing agency,  and the counties acting under the exemption granted pursuant to ORS
443.780, shall report on a quarterly basis to the Legislative Assembly on the number  of exceptions
granted during the quarter pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The provider  may not employ a resident manager who does not meet the classification
standard for the adult foster home.
(3) The provider shall be able to meet the  night care needs of a resident before admitting the
resident. The provider shall include night care needs in the resident’s care plan.
(4) The provider shall screen a prospective resident  before admitting the resident. The screening
shall include but is not limited to diagnosis, medications, personal care  needs, nursing care needs,
night care needs, nutritional needs, activities  and lifestyle preferences. A copy of the screening shall
be given to the prospective resident or the prospective resident’s representative.
(5) The licensing agency shall make rules to ensure  that any employee who makes a complaint
pursuant to ORS 443.755 shall be protected from retaliation.
(6) For adult foster homes in which clients reside for whom the licensing agency pays  for care,
including homes in which the provider and the resident  are related, the agency may require sub-
stantial compliance with its  rules relating to standards for care of the client as a condition for
paying for care.
(7) By order the director of the licensing  agency may delegate authority under this section to
personnel other than of the licensing agency.
(8) The licensing agency may commence  a suit in equity to enjoin maintenance of an adult foster
home if:
(a) The home is operated without a valid license under this section; or
(b) After the license to maintain the home is ordered suspended or revoked, a reasonable time
for placement of residents in  other facilities has been allowed but such placement has not been ac-
complished.
(9) The licensing  agency shall establish by rule the maximum capacity of adult foster homes,
including all nonrelated and related persons receiving residential care and day care.
(10) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section:
(a) The Department of Human Services may impose a civil penalty  on any person who violates
a provision of  ORS 443.705 to 443.825, or the rules adopted under ORS 443.705 to 443.825, with re-
gard to an  adult foster home serving socially dependent individuals or individuals with physical
disabilities. The department  shall establish the amount of the penalty by rule, in an amount not less
than $100 and not more than $250  per violation, or in the case of substantiated abuse, not less than
$100 and not more than $1,000 per violation.
(b) The department may  impose a civil penalty on any person who violates a provision of ORS
443.705 to 443.825, or the rules adopted under ORS 443.705 to 443.825, with regard  to an adult foster
home not serving socially dependent individuals or individuals with physical  disabilities. The de-
partment shall establish the amount of the penalty by rule,  in an amount not to exceed $100 per
violation, to a maximum of $250,  or, per occurrence of substantiated abuse, to a maximum of $1,000.
(c) The  Oregon Health Authority may impose a civil penalty on any person who violates a pro-
vision of ORS 443.705 to 443.825, or the rules adopted under ORS  443.705 to 443.825. The authority
shall establish the amount of the penalty by rule, in an amount not to  exceed $100 per violation, to
a maximum of $250, or, per occurrence of substantiated abuse, to a maximum of $1,000.
(11)(a) If the licensing agency determines that there is reasonable cause  to believe that abuse
occurred  in  an adult foster home licensed by the licensing agency and if the abuse resulted in the
death, serious injury, rape, sexual abuse or sexual exploitation of a  resident, the licensing agency
shall impose a civil penalty on the adult foster home of not less than $2,500 for each violation.
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 15
(b) This subsection does not apply to adult foster homes  licensed by the licensing agency to
serve only persons with mental illness or with alcohol or drug addiction.
(c) The licensing agency shall by  rule define “serious injury,” “rape,” “sexual abuse” and “sex-
ual exploitation” for purposes of this subsection.
(12) All penalties recovered pursuant to this section shall be  deposited in the Quality Care Fund
established in ORS 443.001.
REPEALS
SECTION 30. ORS 678.155 is repealed.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 31. The unit captions  used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
OPERATIVE AND EFFECTIVE DATES
SECTION 32. (1) The  amendments to ORS 169.750, 441.685, 443.445, 443.775, 678.010,
678.031, 678.034, 678.038, 678.039, 678.040, 678.050, 678.055, 678.101,  678.111, 678.113, 678.150,
678.170, 678.340, 678.370, 678.392, 678.396, 678.398, 678.410, 678.415, 678.440, 678.442, 678.444 and
678.445 by sections 1 to 19 and 21 to 29 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of  ORS 678.155 by
section 30 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon State Board of Nursing may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that  is necessary to enable the board to exercise,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties,
functions and powers conferred  on the board by the amendments to ORS 169.750, 441.685,
443.445, 443.775, 678.010, 678.031,  678.034, 678.038, 678.039, 678.040, 678.050, 678.055, 678.101,
678.111, 678.113, 678.150, 678.170, 678.340, 678.370, 678.392, 678.396,  678.398, 678.410, 678.415,
678.440, 678.442, 678.444 and 678.445 by sections 1 to 19 and 21 to 29 of this 2025 Act and the
repeal of ORS 678.155 by section 30 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 33.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 16
Passed by House March 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3044 (HB 3044-A) Page 17